Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 21 IDAHO CREDIT UNION ACT
§ 26-2117. Penalties for official misconduct.

Any officer, director, or committee member or loan officer of a credit union who knowingly permits a loan to be made or participates in a loan to a nonmember is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be primarily liable to the credit union for the amount thus illegally loaned and the illegality of such a loan shall be no defense in any action of the credit union to recover on the loan.

Any officer, director, committee member, agent or employee who knowingly makes or subscribes to false entries or exhibits a false or fictitious paper, instrument, or security to a person authorized to examine the credit union books and records shall be guilty of a felony.

Any officer, director, committee member, agent or employee who receives payments on shares knowing the credit union is insolvent shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2117, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2118. Credit committee — Appointment — Duties.

The board may appoint a credit committee. The credit committee shall have the general supervision of all loans to members. It shall be the duty of the credit committee to review all applications for loans, to ascertain whether the loan would be for a provident or productive purpose, to determine whether the applicant qualifies for the loan under the credit union’s loan and underwriting policies, and to determine whether the security offered, in the credit committee’s judgment, is sufficient, and whether the requested terms of the loan are in accordance with the credit union’s loan and underwriting policies.

The credit committee shall meet as often as necessary and at least once each month to review delinquent loans. The credit committee shall keep a record of all actions taken at each meeting and shall submit a written report to the members at the annual meetings and to the board monthly.

The credit committee, upon approval by the board, may appoint one (1) or more loan officers to act under the supervision of the credit committee, and a loan officer, when appointed, may make loans without the necessity for a meeting or of approval by any members of the credit committee, as provided in the bylaws. No more than one (1) member of the credit committee may serve in the position of loan officer. No individual shall have authority to disburse funds of the credit union for any loan that has been approved by him in his capacity as loan officer, except that the loan officer may disburse loans approved by him that are fully secured by shares or that do not exceed the credit union’s unsecured loan limit set by the board of directors.

No member of the credit committee may serve as a member of the board of directors or supervisory committee while serving as a member of the credit committee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2118, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 14, p. 328.

§ 26-2119. Loans.

A credit union may make secured and unsecured loans to its members under policies established by the board. A person that is not a member of the credit union may serve as a co-borrower or guarantor on a loan to a member of the credit union. Each loan must be evidenced by records adequate to support enforcement or collection of the loan and any review of the loan by the director.

A credit union may not extend credit to a director, executive officer, supervisory committee member, or credit committee member unless the extension of credit is made on substantially the same terms as those prevailing at the time for comparable transactions by the credit union with members generally.

For the purposes of this section, “executive officer” means a person who participates or has authority to participate in policymaking functions of the credit union.

A director, executive officer, supervisory committee member, or credit committee member may not participate in approving or disbursing a loan in which the director, executive officer, supervisory committee member, or credit committee member has a direct or indirect financial interest.

This section shall not prohibit any extension of credit made pursuant to a benefit or compensation program adopted by the board of directors that:

Is widely available to employees of the credit union; and

Does not give preference to any director, executive officer, supervisory committee member, or credit committee member over other employees of the credit union.

Establish a limit on the aggregate amount of loan participations that may be purchased from any one (1) originating lender, not to exceed the greater of five million dollars ($5,000,000) or one hundred percent (100%) of the credit union’s net worth, unless this amount is waived by the director;

Establish limits on the amount of loan participations that may be purchased by each loan type, not to exceed a specified percentage of the credit union’s net worth; and

Establish a limit on the aggregate amount of loan participations that may be purchased with respect to a single borrower, or group of associated borrowers, not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the credit union’s net worth, unless waived by the director;

A credit union may make loans to another credit union, federal credit union, or out-of-state credit union.

A credit union may purchase loans made to its members if the credit union’s underwriting policies would have permitted it to originate the loans.

A credit union may purchase, in whole or in part, within the limitations of the board of directors’ written purchase policies:

A loan or group of loans of its members from any source, if they are loans the credit union is empowered to grant or the loan or loans are refinanced with the consent of the borrowers within sixty (60) days after they are purchased, so that they are loans it is empowered to grant;

A loan or group of loans of a liquidating credit union’s individual members from the liquidating credit union;

Student loans from any source if the purchaser is granting student loans on an ongoing basis and if the purchase will facilitate the purchasing credit union’s packaging of a pool of such loans to be sold or pledged on the secondary market. A pool must include a substantial portion of the credit union’s members’ loans and must be sold promptly; and

Real estate-secured loans, from any source, if the purchaser is granting real estate-secured loans on an ongoing basis and if the purchase will facilitate the purchasing credit union’s packaging of a pool of such loans to be sold or pledged on the secondary mortgage market. A pool must include a substantial portion of the credit union’s members’ loans and must be sold promptly.
(6) A credit union may sell in whole or in part, to any source, a loan to its members within the limitations of the board of directors’ written sale policies, provided:

The purchase complies with the purchasing credit union’s internal written loan participation policy, which, at a minimum, must:

Establish underwriting standards for loan participations;

A loan participation agreement must:

Be properly executed by authorized representatives of all parties under applicable law;

Be properly authorized by the credit union’s board of directors or, if the board has so delegated in its policy, a designated committee or senior management official under the credit union’s bylaws and all applicable law;

Be retained, either in original or copied form, in the credit union’s office; and

Include provisions that, at a minimum, address the following:
1. Prior to purchase, the identification of the specific loan participation or participations being purchased, either directly in the agreement or through a document that is incorporated by reference into the agreement;

(a) The board of directors or investment committee approves the sale; and

(b) A written agreement and a schedule of the eligible obligations covered by the agreement are retained in the credit union’s office.

(7) A credit union may purchase a participation interest in a loan from a credit union, credit union service organization, federally insured financial institution, and any state or federal government agency and its subdivision only if the loan is one the purchasing credit union is empowered to grant and the following additional conditions are satisfied:

(a) The purchase complies with all requirements to the same extent as if the purchasing credit union had originated the loan;

(b) The purchasing credit union has executed a written loan participation agreement with the originating lender and the agreement meets the minimum requirements for a loan participation agreement as described in paragraph (g) of this subsection;

(c) The originating lender retains an interest in each participated loan of at least ten percent (10%) of the outstanding balance of the loan through the life of the loan, unless a higher percentage is required under applicable state law;

(d) The borrower becomes a member of one of the participating credit unions before the purchasing credit union purchases a participation interest in the loan;

(f) To seek a waiver from any of the limitations in subsection (7) of this section, a credit union must submit a written request to the director with a full and detailed explanation of why it is requesting the waiver. Within forty-five (45) days of receipt of a completed waiver request, including all necessary supporting documentation and, if appropriate, any written concurrence, the director shall provide the credit union a written response. The director’s decision shall be based on safety and soundness and other considerations. A credit union may request the director to reconsider a denied waiver request or to file an appeal under the administrative procedures rules, or both; and

2. The interest that the originating lender will retain in the loan to be participated through the life of the loan;

3. The location and custodian for original loan documents;

4. An explanation of the conditions under which parties to the agreement can gain access to financial and other performance information about a loan, the borrower, and the servicer so the parties can monitor the loan;

5. An explanation of the duties and responsibilities of the originating lender, servicer, and participants with respect to all aspects of the participation, including servicing, default, foreclosure, collection, and other matters involving the ongoing administration of the loan; and

6. Circumstances and conditions under which participants may replace the servicer.

(8) Any real estate-secured loans granted by a nonfederally insured credit union shall comply with the appraisal requirements for federally insured credit unions. The director may require any credit union to obtain an appraisal on any real estate-secured loan whenever the director believes it necessary to address safety and soundness concerns.

(9) Any officer, director, supervisory committee member, or credit committee member who knowingly permits a loan to be made or participates in a loan to a nonmember of the credit union, unless the loan to the nonmember is otherwise allowed in this chapter or by a rule pursuant to this chapter, shall be primarily liable to the credit union for the amount illegally loaned. The illegality of such loan shall not be a defense in any action by the credit union to recover the amount loaned.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2119, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 6, p. 671.

§ 26-2120. Limit on loan amount — Loans to one borrower.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by a rule pursuant to this chapter, no loan may be made to any borrower if the loan would cause the borrower and any associated borrowers to be indebted to the credit union on all types of loans in an aggregated amount exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or fifteen percent (15%) of the net worth of the credit union, whichever is greater, without the approval of the director.

This section does not apply to a corporate credit union.

Two (two) borrowers are “associated” for the purposes of this section if any of the following factors are present:

One (1) of them will derive a direct benefit from the credit union’s loan to the other. For this purpose, the term “direct benefit” means that the loan proceeds or assets purchased with those proceeds will be transferred to the other party other than in a bona fide arm’s length transaction where the proceeds are used to acquire property, goods, or services;

Loan proceeds for each of them are used to purchase interests in the same enterprise, and the borrowers will in the aggregate own more than fifty percent (50%) of the ownership interests in such enterprise. In such case, the borrowers are considered associated only to the extent of the loans made to purchase interests in the same enterprise;

The borrowers are related directly or indirectly through common control and either borrower derives fifty percent (50%) or more of its income from the other. For this purpose, “control” means that a person directly or indirectly owns or has the power to vote twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the ownership interest of an organization, controls the election of a majority of the directors, managers, trustees, or other persons exercising similar functions of an organization, or has the power to exercise a controlling influence over the management or policies of the organization;

The expected source of repayment is the same for each borrower, and no individual borrower has a separate source of income from which the loan may be paid, taking into account the borrower’s other obligations; or

One (1) borrower is generally liable for the obligations or actions of the other.

The limit on a loan amount in this section does not apply to any loan that is fully secured by shares or deposits.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2120, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 8, p. 671.

§ 26-2120A. Limit on loan maturity.

The maturity of a loan to a member may not exceed fifteen (15) years except as follows:

A credit union may make loans with maturities not to exceed twenty (20) years in the case of:

A loan to finance the purchase of a manufactured home if the manufactured home will be used as the member’s residence and the loan is secured by a first lien on the manufactured home, and the manufactured home meets the requirements for the deductibility of residential mortgage interest for income tax under the Internal Revenue Code;

A second mortgage loan or a nonpurchase money first mortgage loan in the case of a residence on which there is no existing first mortgage, if the loan is secured by a residential dwelling that is the residence of the member; and

A loan to finance the repair, alteration, or improvement of a residential dwelling that is the residence of the member.

A credit union may make residential real estate loans on one-to-four family dwellings used as second or vacation residences, including an individual cooperative unit, and that are secured by a first lien upon such dwelling, with maturities not to exceed thirty (30) years.

A credit union may make residential real estate loans to members, including loans secured by manufactured homes permanently affixed to the land, with maturities not to exceed forty (40) years, subject to the following conditions:

The loan shall be made on a one-to-four family dwelling that is or will be the principal residence of the member, and the loan shall be secured by a perfected first lien in favor of the credit union on such dwelling, or a perfected first security interest in the case of either a residential cooperative or a leasehold or ground rent estate;

The loan application shall be a completed standard federal housing administration, veterans administration, federal home loan mortgage corporation, federal national mortgage association, or federal home loan mortgage corporation/federal national mortgage association application form. In lieu of use of a standard application, the credit union may have a current attorney’s opinion on file stating that the forms in use meet the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local laws;

The security instrument and note shall be executed on the most current version of the federal housing administration, veterans administration, federal home loan mortgage corporation, federal national mortgage association, or federal home loan mortgage corporation/federal national mortgage association uniform instruments for the jurisdiction in which the property is located. In lieu of use of a standard security instrument and note, the credit union may have a current attorney’s opinion on file stating that the security instrument and note in use meet the requirements of applicable federal, state, and local laws; and

The loan shall be secured by a perfected first lien or first security interest in favor of the credit union supported by a properly executed and recorded security instrument.

Lines of credit are not subject to a maturity limit except as determined by contract between the credit union and the member.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2120A, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 9, p. 671.

§ 26-2121. Supervisory committee — Membership — Terms — Vacancies.

A supervisory committee of at least three (3) members must be appointed by the board as provided in the bylaws. Members of the supervisory committee shall serve a term of one (1) to three (3) years, unless sooner removed under this chapter or until their successors are qualified and elected or appointed. The members of the supervisory committee shall be divided into classes so that as equal a number as is possible is appointed each year.

At least one (1) supervisory committee member may attend each regular meeting of the board. However, supervisory committee members may be excluded from executive sessions of board meetings.

If a supervisory committee member is absent from more than one-fourth (¼) of the committee meetings in any twelve (12) month period without being reasonably excused by the committee, the member shall no longer serve as a member of the committee.
(3)(a) If a supervisory committee member is absent from more than one-fourth (¼) of the committee meetings in any twelve (12) month period without being reasonably excused by the committee, the member shall no longer serve as a member of the committee.

The supervisory committee shall promptly notify the member that such member shall no longer serve as a committee member. Failure to provide notice does not affect the termination of the member’s service under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

A supervisory committee member must be a natural person and a member of the credit union. If a member of the supervisory committee ceases to be a member of the credit union, the member shall no longer serve as a committee member.

Any vacancy on the committee must be filled by an interim member appointed by the board.

No operating officer or employee of a credit union may serve on the credit union’s supervisory committee. No more than one (1) director may be a member of the supervisory committee at the same time. No member of the supervisory committee may serve on the credit committee or investment committee of the credit union while serving on the supervisory committee. No board officer of a credit union may serve as the chairperson of the supervisory committee.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2121, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 16, p. 328.

§ 26-2121A. Supervisory committee duties.

The supervisory committee of a credit union shall:

Meet at least quarterly;

Keep fully informed as to the financial condition of the credit union and the decisions of the credit union’s board;

Perform or arrange for an annual audit of the credit union’s financial statements and provide any related findings and recommendations to the board;

Make or cause to be made a verification of member accounts as follows:

At least annually by statistical sampling, with the sampling method to provide for:

Random selection;

A sample that is representative of the population from which it was selected;

An equal chance of selecting each dollar in the population;

Sufficient accounts in both number and scope on which to base conclusions concerning management’s financial reporting objectives; and

Additional procedures to be performed if evidence provided by confirmation alone is not sufficient; or

At least annually by nonstatistical sampling conducted by an independent person licensed as an accountant in the state of Idaho, using nonstatistical sampling methods consistent with generally accepted auditing standards if such methods provide for:

At least every two (2) years by controlled verification of all member accounts;

Review or arrange to have reviewed annually the effectiveness of the credit union’s internal controls;

Report its findings and recommendations to the board;

Provide an annual written report to members at each annual membership meeting on the credit union’s financial condition;

Perform or arrange for additional audits as requested by the board or management or as deemed necessary by the supervisory committee and provide any related findings and recommendations to management or the board as deemed appropriate by the supervisory committee;

Monitor the implementation of management responses to material adverse findings in audits and regulatory examinations;

Implement a process for the supervisory committee to receive and respond to whistleblower complaints; and

Perform any additional duties as specified by the board or in the credit union’s bylaws.

The supervisory committee may in its sole discretion retain, at the credit union’s expense, independent counsel or other professional advisors or consultants as necessary to perform the duties under this section.
History.

1. Sufficient accounts in both number and scope on which to base conclusions concerning management’s financial reporting objectives to provide assurance that the general ledger accounts are fairly stated in relation to the financial statements taken as a whole;

2. Additional procedures to be performed by the accountant if evidence provided by confirmations alone is not sufficient; and

3. Documentation of the sampling procedures used and of their consistency with generally accepted auditing standards, to be provided to the department upon request; or

I.C.,§ 26-2121A, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 17, p. 328; am. 2019, ch. 188, § 3, p. 596.

§ 26-2121B. Suspension of members of the board by supervisory committee — For cause.

The supervisory committee may, for cause, suspend a member of the board, until a special membership meeting called for that purpose is held in accordance with the requirements of section 26-2113B, Idaho Code. The members participating in that meeting shall vote whether to remove the suspended person or persons.

For purposes of this section, “cause” means demonstrated financial irresponsibility, a breach of fiduciary duty to the credit union, or activities which, in the judgment of the supervisory committee, create a material risk to the credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2121B, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 18, p. 328.

§ 26-2121C. Suspension of members of the board of supervisory committee by board — For cause.

The board may, for cause, suspend a member of the board or a member of the supervisory committee until a special membership meeting, called for that purpose, is held. The membership meeting must be held within ninety (90) days after the suspension. The members attending the meeting shall vote whether to remove a suspended party.

For purposes of this section, “cause” means demonstrated financial irresponsibility, a breach of fiduciary duty to the credit union, or activities which, in the judgment of the board, create a material risk to the credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2121C, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 19, p. 328.

§ 26-2121D. Removal of director or supervisory committee member.

The members of a credit union may remove a director of the credit union at a special membership meeting held in accordance with section 26-2113B, Idaho Code, and called for that purpose. If the members remove a director, the members may at the same special membership meeting elect an interim director to complete the remainder of the former director’s term of office or authorize the board to appoint an interim director as provided in section 26-2114, Idaho Code.

If at any time, because of the removal of one (1) or more credit union directors under this chapter, the board of directors of a credit union has less than a quorum of directors, all powers and functions vested in or exercisable by the board vest in and are exercisable by the director or directors remaining until such a time as there is a quorum on the board of directors. If all of the directors of a credit union are removed under this chapter, the director of the department of finance shall appoint persons to serve temporarily as directors of the credit union until such a time as their respective successors take office.

The members of a credit union may remove a supervisory committee member at a special membership meeting held in accordance with section 26-2113B, Idaho Code, and called for that purpose. If the members remove a supervisory committee member, the members may at the same special membership meeting elect an interim supervisory committee member to complete the remainder of the former supervisory committee member’s term of office or authorize the supervisory committee to appoint an interim supervisory committee member as provided in section 26-2121, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2121D, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 20, p. 328.

§ 26-2122. Compensation — Credit union manager, employment.

No officer, director, or committee member may be compensated, directly or indirectly, for his services as such; provided, however, an elected member of the board of directors may serve as a part-time treasurer and receive a salary for his services. This shall not be construed to prevent reimbursement of directors and committee members for actual expenses they may incur in carrying out the duties of their office. The board may authorize the employment of a credit union manager and other employees as needed to conduct the business of the credit union. The board shall establish the compensation to be paid to the manager and any other employees of the credit union which shall be charged as an expense of the credit union. In the event the board of directors authorizes the employment of a manager of the credit union, the manager may not be a member of the board of directors. The credit union may provide group hospitalization and group health and accident insurance for the directors, officers and committee members which will not be considered compensation.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2122, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2123. Shares and certificates of deposit.

A share may be in increments of five dollars ($5.00) with a minimum of five dollars ($5.00) and a maximum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) as the board of directors shall establish. The shares of a credit union shall all be common shares of one (1) class and have a par value as established by the board and bylaws. A member may purchase shares which will earn dividends as duly established by the board pursuant to section 26-2130, Idaho Code. Members may also purchase certificates of deposit which will be for a specified length of time and earn interest with a guaranteed rate to be established by the board of directors pursuant to section 26-2130, Idaho Code. No certificate shall be issued to denote ownership of a share of the credit union. Shares paid for may be transferred in such manner as the bylaws may prescribe.

In the event of default the credit union shall have and may exercise a lien on the shares and deposits of any member for any sum due the credit union from said member or for any loan made to, cosigned or endorsed by him. Christmas clubs, vacation clubs, travel clubs and other thrift organizations within the membership, which shall have the prior approval of the director of finance, may be established by the board of directors.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2123, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2124. Joint accounts.

A member may designate any person or persons to hold shares, deposits, and thrift club accounts with him in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship; but no joint tenant, unless a member in his own right, shall be permitted to vote, obtain loans, or hold office. Payment of part or all of such accounts to any of the joint tenants shall, to the extent of such payment, discharge the liability to all.

No credit union organized under the laws of this state shall be required to recognize the claim of any third party of any of the above such accounts or withhold payment of any such accounts to the depositor or to his order, unless and until the credit union is served with citation or other appropriate process issuing out of a court of competent jurisdiction in connection with a suit instituted by such third party for the purpose of recovering or establishing an interest in such above accounts.

Such above accounts issued by any credit union organized under the laws of this state in the name of two (2) or more persons or to two (2) or more persons or the survivor of either, may be withdrawn on the signature of either party of whom such accounts were issued, or in whose name such accounts were made, and no recovery shall be had against such credit union for amounts so paid. When such accounts are issued in the name of two (2) or more persons or in the name of their survivor, the survivor of either party shall have power to act in all matters relating to such accounts whether the other person or persons named in such accounts be living or dead. The repurchase or withdrawal value of such accounts issued in joint names and dividends thereon, or other rights relating thereto, may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to any such person who shall make requests therefor, whether the other person or persons be living or dead. The payment or delivery to any such person, on a receipt or acquittance signed by any such person, to whom any such payment or any such delivery of rights be made, shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of any such credit union for the payment or delivery so made.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2124, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2125. Minors.

Shares, deposits or thrift club accounts may be issued in the name of a minor and such above accounts may be withdrawn by such minor and payments made on such withdrawals shall be valid.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2125, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2126. Trust accounts.

Share [Shares] may be issued in the name of a member in trust for a beneficiary, including a minor, but no beneficiary, unless a member in his own right, may be permitted to vote, obtain loans, hold office or be required to pay an entrance fee. Payment of part or all of such shares to such member shall, to the extent of such payment, discharge the liability of the credit union to the member and the beneficiary, and the credit union shall be under no obligation to see the application of such payment. In the event of the death of the member, and if shares are so issued or held and the credit union has been given no other written evidence of the existence or terms of any trust, such shares and any dividends or interest thereon shall be paid to the beneficiary.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2126, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2127. Investment of funds.

A credit union’s board of directors must establish a written investment policy consistent with this chapter and other applicable laws and regulations.

A credit union may invest its funds in any of the following, as long as the investments are deemed prudent by the board:

Loans held by credit unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions; and
(a)(i) Loans held by credit unions, out-of-state credit unions, or federal credit unions; and

Loans to members held by other lenders, with approval of the director;

Bonds, securities, or other investments that are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States government;

General obligations of this state and its political subdivisions;

Obligations issued by corporations designated under 31 U.S.C. 9101, or obligations, participations, or other instruments issued and guaranteed by the federal housing administration, veterans administration, federal home loan mortgage corporation, federal national mortgage association, or federal home loan mortgage corporation/federal national mortgage association, or other government-sponsored enterprise;

Share or deposit accounts of other financial institutions, the accounts of which are federally insured or insured or guaranteed by another insurer or guarantor approved by the director. The shares and deposits made by a credit union under this subsection may exceed the insurance or guarantee limits established by the organization insuring or guaranteeing the institution into which the shares or deposits are made;

Common trust or mutual funds whose investment portfolios consist of securities issued or guaranteed by the federal government or an agency of the government;

Shares or other interests offered by a registered investment company or collective investment fund, if the company or fund restricts the investment portfolio to investments and investment transactions that are permissible for credit unions, as evidenced by its prospectus or other appropriate documentation;

Debt or equity issued by an organization owned by a credit union trade association whose members include Idaho credit unions, in an aggregate amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of the net worth of the credit union;

Stocks, shares, membership units, or other ownership interests in corporations, limited liability companies, or mutual associations, in an aggregate amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of assets, and loans to such organizations in an aggregate amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of assets if:

The ownership of such organizations or membership of such mutual associations, as applicable, is primarily confined to credit unions or organizations of credit unions; and

The purposes for which the corporation, limited liability company, or mutual association is formed are primarily to service credit unions or their members or otherwise to assist credit union operations.

The director may authorize credit unions to purchase investments not listed above by rule or upon written application.

If a credit union has lawfully made an investment that later becomes impermissible because of a change in circumstances or law, and the director finds that this investment will have an adverse effect on the safety and soundness of the credit union, then the director may require that the credit union develop a reasonable plan for the divestiture of the investment.

A credit union other than a corporate credit union shall not invest an amount that exceeds twenty-five percent (25%) of its net worth in an obligor or affiliate of the obligor. This subsection does not apply to the extent that the investment is insured or guaranteed by the United States government or an agency of the United States government or a state or local government or that the investment is in a corporate credit union.

A credit union shall maintain files containing credit and other information adequate to demonstrate evidence of prudent business judgment in exercising the investment powers granted under this act or by rule, order, or declaratory ruling of the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2127, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 11, p. 671.

§ 26-2128. Liquidity requirements.

Every credit union shall have on hand as a liquidity reserve an amount equal to four percent (4%) of its outstanding shares, certificates of deposit, and certificates of indebtedness. Share or deposit accounts from which a member may withdraw funds by the use of a negotiable instrument shall be subject to the liquidity reserve requirements of subsection (b) of this section and not to the liquidity reserve requirements of this subsection. Said liquidity reserves, except as hereinafter otherwise provided, shall be kept in cash on hand or on deposit subject to check or draft, with any bank or banks or corporate credit union located in the state of Idaho, which shall have been approved by the director as liquidity reserve depositories and shall be computed monthly as follows: on the basis of average daily bank deposits and average daily cash on hand.

Every credit union which provides for its member’s share or deposit accounts from which the member may withdraw funds by the use of negotiable instrument shall have on hand as a liquidity reserve in addition to the liquidity reserve required by subsection (a) of this section an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of its share and deposit accounts which are subject to withdrawal by the use of negotiable instrument. Said liquidity reserves shall be kept in cash on hand or on deposit subject to check or draft, with any bank or banks or corporate credit union located in the state of Idaho which shall have been approved by the director as liquidity reserve depositories and shall be computed monthly as follows: on the basis of average daily bank or corporate credit union deposits, and average daily cash on hand.

Certificates of deposit issued by the Idaho Corporate Credit Union may be included in meeting the requirements of this section. To the extent a credit union is required to maintain reserves pursuant to the monetary control act of 1980 and the implementing regulations of the board of governors of the federal reserve system, as the same is presently enacted and as it may be amended in the future, the reserves required to be so maintained shall be considered as a part of, and not in addition to, the liquidity reserves required by this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2128, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1979, ch. 230, § 1, p. 629; am. 1981, ch. 260, § 1, p. 550; am. 1991, ch. 236, § 3, p. 566.